Washington statutes.
RCW 8.20.120

Appellate review.

Either party may seek appellate review of the judgment for damages entered in the superior court within thirty days after the entry of judgment as aforesaid and such review shall bring before the supreme court or the court of appeals the propriety and justness of the amount of damages in respect to the parties to the review: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no bond shall be required of any person interested in the property sought to be appropriated by such corporation, but in case the corporation appropriating such land, real estate, premises, or other property is appellant, it shall give a bond like that prescribed in RCW 8.20.130, to be executed, filed, and approved in the same manner: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the owner of the land, real estate, premises, or other property accepts the sum awarded by the jury, the court, or the judge thereof, he or she shall be deemed thereby to have waived conclusively appellate review, and final judgment by default may be rendered in the superior court as in other cases.

[ 2011 c 336 s 279; 1988 c 202 s 14; 1971 c 81 s 43; 1890 p 300 s 9; RRS s 931. Prior: 1888 p 61 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.